Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.26
Aircraft; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of an aircraft delivered in this state to an individual who is a resident of another state or any other person who has a business location in another state when the aircraft is not to be registered or based in this state and it will not remain in this state more than ten days. Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from a service listed in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 that is rendered to an aircraft brought into this state by an individual who is a resident of another state or any other person who has a business location in another state when the aircraft is not to be registered or based in this state and it will not remain in this state more than ten days after the service is completed.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 46;

Laws 2002, LB 1085, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 58;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 16;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 18.